Maryland, session 2025, SB0171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
4–206.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE PROCESS OF FILLING A VACANCY
IN THE OFFICE OF SENATOR OR DELEGATE IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER
ARTICLE III, § 13 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(B) (1) THE APPLICATION PERIOD TO APPLY TO A CENTRAL COMMITTEE
TO FILL A VACANCY SHALL BE:
(I) OPEN FOR AT LEAST 7 DAYS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0171*

SENATE BILL 171
(II) ADVERTISED IN A CONSPICUOUS MANNER BY THE CENTRAL
COMMITTEE FILLING THE VACANCY BY A PUBLIC NOTICE THAT INCLUDES:
1. THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE’S INTENT TO MEET TO FILL
THE VACANCY;
2. THE TIME AND PLACE OF ANY MEETINGS TO BE HELD
TO DISCUSS OR VOTE ON THE FILLING OF THE VACANCY;
3. THE PROCESS FOR FILLING THE VACANCY; AND
4. THE MANNER IN WHICH INDIVIDUALS MAY APPLY TO
FILL THE VACANCY.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE TRANSLATED INTO A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH IF
THE LOCAL BOARD FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE IS
LOCATED IS REQUIRED TO TRANSLATE ELECTION MATERIALS INTO THAT LANGUAGE
UNDER § 203 OF THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS ACT.
(C) ALL APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED TO A CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO FILL A
VACANCY SHALL:
(1) BE POSTED ONLINE PROMPTLY AFTER THE APPLICATION
DEADLINE BY THE COUNTY CENTRAL COMMITTEE OR THE STATE CENTRAL
COMMITTEE OF THE POLITICAL PARTY; AND
(2) REMAIN POSTED ONLINE UNTIL AT LEAST 30 DAYS AFTER THE
CENTRAL COMMITTEE VOTES ON AN INDIVIDUAL TO FILL THE VACANCY.
(D) THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC MEETING TO
INTERVIEW THE INDIVIDUALS WHO APPLIED TO FILL THE VACANCY.
(E) A MEETING HELD BY A CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO DISCUSS OR VOTE ON
FILLING A VACANCY SHALL BE:
(1) OPEN TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(2) ANNOUNCED AT LEAST 3 DAYS BEFORE THE MEETING.
(F) (1) THE VOTE BY A CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO CHOOSE AN INDIVIDUAL
TO FILL A VACANCY SHALL BE:

SENATE BILL 171 3
(I) BY ROLL CALL VOTE OR BY SIGNED BALLOTS; AND
(II) IN A MEETING OPEN TO THE PUBLIC.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE WHO HAS APPLIED TO
FILL THE VACANCY SHALL RECUSE THEMSELVES FROM:
(I) ADMINISTERING THE PROCESS OF FILLING THE VACANCY,
INCLUDING ADVERTISING THE VACANCY, REVIEWING APPLICATIONS, AND
INTERVIEWING CANDIDATES; AND
(II) VOTING ON THE INDIVIDUAL TO FILL THE VACANCY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.